Colorado, session 2026A, HB1396.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-703, add (2.5)
and (9) as follows:
24-33.5-703. Definitions.
As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:
(2.5) "CLOSE OUT" MEANS THE PROCESS BY WHICH:
(a) THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY REPORTS TO THE OFFICE OF
STATE PLANNING AND BUDGET THAT ALL APPLICABLE ADMINISTRATIVE
ACTIONS AND ALL REQUIRED WORK TO RESPOND TO A SPECIFIC DISASTER ARE
COMPLETE; AND
(b) THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING REMOVES THE
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SUBACCOUNT FOR A SPECIFIC DISASTER FROM THE DISASTER EMERGENCY
FUND AND TRANSFERS ANY REMAINING BALANCE OF THE SUBACCOUNT BACK
TO THE FUND THAT WAS THE ORIGINAL SOURCE OF THE MONEY.
(9) "UNENCUMBERED" MEANS ANY AMOUNT OF MONEY THAT IS NOT
RESERVED FOR RESPONSE TO A SPECIFIC DISASTER THROUGH AN EXECUTIVE
ORDER DECLARED BY THE GOVERNOR.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-706, amend
(2)(a), (7)(a)(IV), and (7)(a)(V); and add (2)(c), (7)(a)(VI), and (9) as
follows:
24-33.5-706. Disaster emergency fund - established - financing
- legislative intent.
(2) (a) A disaster emergency fund is hereby established. The fund
consists of any money appropriated by the general assembly, money
transferred pursuant to subsections (2.5) and SUBSECTION (4)(b) of this
section, and money to reimburse expenditures from the fund that are
transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the fund. Money in the
disaster emergency fund shall remain in the fund until expended or until
transferred pursuant to subsection (2.5)(c), (2)(c), (4.3), (4.5), or (4.7) of
this section or section 24-33.5-1228 (3)(c)(III).
(c) THE ANNUAL UNENCUMBERED BALANCE OF THE DISASTER
EMERGENCY FUND SHALL NOT EXCEED TWO HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS.
AFTER AUGUST 12, 2026, AND ON JUNE 30 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING SHALL TRANSFER ANY
UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE DISASTER EMERGENCY FUND IN EXCESS OF
TWO HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(7) (a) No later than September 20, 2020, the office of state planning
and budgeting shall submit a report to the joint budget committee of the
expenditures from the fund during the last twelve months. Notwithstanding
section 24-1-136 (11)(a), no later than the twentieth day of every third
month thereafter, the office shall submit a report to the joint budget
committee of the expenditures from the fund since the last report. The
office shall separately identify expenditures by disaster, if there is more than
one to be included in the report, and, for each disaster, the office shall
identify:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1396

(IV) Total expenditures by state agency; and
(V) A breakdown of expenditures; AND
(VI) DISASTERS THAT HAVE BEEN CLOSED OUT AND THE AMOUNT OF
UNENCUMBERED MONEY THAT THE OFFICE TRANSFERRED BACK TO THE FUND
THAT WAS THE ORIGINAL SOURCE OF THE MONEY.
(9) (a) FOR FEDERALLY DECLARED DISASTERS, WITHIN THREE YEARS
OF THE LAST DATE THAT REVENUE INTO THE FUND OR EXPENDITURES FROM
THE FUND ARE RECORDED FOR A DISASTER, THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY SHALL CLOSE OUT THE EMERGENCY.
(b) FOR STATE-ONLY DISASTERS, WITHIN EIGHT YEARS OF THE LAST
DATE THAT REVENUE INTO THE FUND OR EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND ARE
RECORDED FOR A DISASTER, THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY SHALL
CLOSE OUT THE EMERGENCY.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1396

and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1396